District of Columbia statutes.
42-1002

General power.

A power is general where it authorizes the alienation in fee, by means of a conveyance, will, or charge, of the lands embraced in the power to any alienee whatever.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1353, ch. 854, § 1038
1981 Ed., § 45-102.
1973 Ed., § 45-1002.